Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-5.5] Water resource management fund.
(a) There is established in the department a special fund to be designated as
the water resource management fund. The fund shall be administered by the
commission. The water resource management fund shall be used for the
following:

(1) Monitoring programs and activities concerning
water resource quality, protection, and management;

(2) Research programs and activities concerning water
conservation and investigation of alternative sources of water;

(3) Preparation and dissemination of information to
the public concerning activities authorized under this chapter;

(4) Data collection, development, and updating of
long-range planning documents authorized under this chapter; and

(5) Any other protection, management, operational, or
maintenance functions authorized and deemed necessary by the commission,
including but not limited to funding permanent or temporary staff positions.

(b) The following shall be deposited into the
water resource management fund:

(1) Appropriations by the legislature to the water
resource management fund;

(2) All fees and administrative charges collected
under this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder;

(3) Moneys collected as fines or penalties imposed
under this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder;

(4) Moneys derived from public and private sources to
benefit water resource protection and management;

(5) Any moneys collected from the sale of retail
items by the department related to water resources;

(6) Any other moneys collected pursuant to chapter
174C; and

(7) Moneys derived from interest, dividend, or other
income from the above sources. [L 2000, c 204, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next